District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.08

Penalty for failure to replace paving stones.

If any person removing the paving stones or other work done by the authority of the United States shall fail to replace the same to the satisfaction of the Director of the National Park Service, within the time prescribed by him, he shall be subject to a penalty of $25 for each and every failure, and shall pay the costs of replacing the same, the whole to be recovered before any court in said District having competent jurisdiction.

History

R.S., D.C., § 230

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1408.
1973 Ed., § 7-1208.